Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1449XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1449XD (1) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 256.160, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. “Grooming behavior” means any behavior, which in light
of all relevant circumstances, constitutes actions to entice
or entrap a student or students with the intent to make such
student or students engage in a sex act the process of building
trust and emotional connections with a student with the intent
to exploit such student.